Illinois, session 104th, SB1741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly makes all of the 5following findings: 6        (1) Licensed school librarians help students acquire 7    unique skills not taught in the classroom and information 8    and technology skills that are essential for students. 9        (2) Academic research provides significant evidence 10    indicating the value added to students' academic 11    development by the presence of a strong school library 12    program led by a licensed school librarian. 13        (3) The presence of full-time, licensed school 14    librarians and appropriate support staff who implement a 15    quality, school-integrated, library-services program is 16    directly related to student educational gains. 17        (4) Quality school library programs staffed by 18    licensed school librarians help close the achievement gap 19    of students who come from economically disadvantaged 20    backgrounds. 21        (5) Curtailment of school-library instructional 22    programs has had a negative impact on students' 23    achievement in kindergarten through grade 12 learning 24    environments and the ability of youth to appropriately and   SB1741- 2 -LRB104 09495 LNS 19556 b1    fully utilize the resources of public and academic 2    libraries. 3        (6) There is an interdependence among types of 4    libraries within a community, school libraries are at the 5    center of this ecosystem, and school libraries provide the 6    beginning of a lifelong connection to academic and public 7    libraries throughout Illinois.8        (7) Government has the responsibility to ensure that 9    every child in the state of Illinois receives a strong 10    foundation in literacy. 11    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 122-3.206 as follows: 13    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)14    Sec. 2-3.206. Licensed School Librarian Task Force.15    (a) As used in this Section, "licensed school librarian" 16means an individual who holds a Professional Educator License 17with a Library Information Specialist endorsement through the 18State Board of Education. 19    (b) The State Board of Education shall establish and 20convene the Licensed School Librarian Task Force within 120 21days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 22104th General Assembly.23    (c) The Task Force shall include all of the following 24members:  SB1741- 3 -LRB104 09495 LNS 19556 b1        (1) Two members appointed by the State Board of 2    Education.3        (2) One member from a statewide organization 4    representing licensed school librarians appointed by the 5    Secretary of State.6        (3) One member from a statewide educational group 7    whose members include licensed school librarians appointed 8    by the Secretary of State.9        (4) One member from each of the Illinois regional 10    library systems appointed by the Secretary of State.11        (5) One member from an Illinois university that offers 12    a licensed information specialist endorsement program 13    appointed by the Governor.14        (6) One member appointed by the President of the 15    Senate.16        (7) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House 17    of Representatives.18        (8) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 19    Senate.20        (9) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 21    House of Representatives.22    The Chairperson of the State Board of Education or his or 23her designee shall be a nonvoting member of the Task Force and 24shall serve as Chairperson of the Task Force. Members of the 25Task Force shall serve for the entirety of the Task Force 26without compensation. If a vacancy occurs in the Task Force's   SB1741- 4 -LRB104 09495 LNS 19556 b1membership, it shall be filled in the same manner as the 2original appointment for the entirety of the Task Force. A 3quorum of Task Force members is not required for the Task Force 4to convene or meet.5    (d) The State Board of Education shall provide 6administrative and technical support to the Task Force.7    (e) The Task Force shall meet a minimum of 4 times and 8shall submit, no later than 12 months after the first 9convening of the Task Force, a report to the Governor and the 10General Assembly containing recommendations, including, but 11not limited to, recommendations on how to ensure public 12elementary and secondary schools consider, budget appropriate 13resources for, and employ licensed school librarians in future 14school years from available State and local resources. The 15Task Force shall also make recommendations on appropriate 16library resources in cases in which licensed school librarians 17are unable to staff or be employed in school libraries that 18serve students in public elementary and secondary schools. The 19Task Force is dissolved upon submission of its report.20    (f) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2027.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.